District of Columbia statutes.
6-1041.08

Agency responsibilities.

(a)

(1)

The District of Columbia Housing Authority (“DCHA”) shall perform all the functions and duties under the Inclusionary Zoning Program as may be delegated to it by the Mayor.

(2)

Nothing in this section shall be construed as preventing the Mayor from delegating any or all of such functions to a subordinate agency.

(b)

Notwithstanding Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1983 [part C, subchapter VI, Chapter 15 of Title 1], effective March 31, 1983, the functions of the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs shall not include any of the functions given to the Mayor under this subchapter, except the functions as may be delegated to it by the Mayor.

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-275, § 108, 54 DCR 880